Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-4315
(UDTA 15) Jurisdiction over trust director.

(UDTA 15) (a) By accepting appointment as a trust director of a trust subject to the Nebraska Uniform Directed Trust Act, the director submits to personal jurisdiction of the courts of this state regarding any matter related to a power or duty of the director.

(b) This section does not preclude other methods of obtaining jurisdiction over a trust director.

Laws 2019, LB536, § 15.